Utah statutes.
77-19-6.   Judgment of death -- Warrant -- Delivery of warrant --
Determination of execution time.
(1) (a)  When judgment of death is rendered, a warrant, signed by the judge
and attested by the clerk under the seal of the court, shall be drawn and
delivered to the sheriff of the county where the conviction is had.
(b)  The sheriff shall deliver the warrant and a certified copy of the
judgment to the executive director of the Department of Corrections or the
executive director's designee at the time of delivering the defendant to the
custody of the Department of Corrections.
(2)  The warrant shall state the conviction, the judgment, the method of
execution, and the appointed day the judgment is to be executed, which may not
be fewer than 30 days nor more than 60 days from the date of issuance of the
warrant, and may not be a Sunday, Monday, or a legal holiday, as defined in
Section 63G-1-301.
(3)  The Department of Corrections shall determine the hour, within the
appointed day, at which the judgment is to be executed.
